Hawaii statutes.
[§302D-35] Use of vacant
department facilities. (a) When any department considers whether to close
any particular facility, it shall give reasonable consideration to making all
or portions of the facility available to public charter schools and early learning
programs that are affiliated with a public charter school.

(b) Each department shall provide notice to
the superintendent and state public charter school commission identifying
suitable unused facilities that may be appropriate for:

(1) Public charter schools; and

(2) Early learning programs, including the pre-plus
program, that are affiliated with a public charter school.

The department of accounting and general
services shall inventory the suitable facilities, and, in determining
suitability for educational reuse, priority shall be given to facilities on
sites with sufficient space for three or more classrooms.

(c) The department of accounting and general
services shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.

(d) For purposes of this section,
"department" means all of the departments listed in section 26-4.

(e) Upon receipt of a notice pursuant to
subsection (b), the state public charter school commission shall:

(1) Solicit applications from public charter schools
or early learning programs that are affiliated with a public charter school,
respectively, that are interested in using and occupying all or portions of the
facilities; and

(2) Submit a prioritized list of public charter
schools or early learning programs that are affiliated with a public charter
school, respectively, to the department of accounting and general services for
final determination of which public charter schools or early learning programs
that are affiliated with a public charter school, if any, shall be authorized
to use and occupy the facilities. [L 2015, c 234, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next